Utah statutes.
78B-15-610.   Joinder of judicial proceedings.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (2), a judicial proceeding to
adjudicate parentage may be joined with a proceeding for adoption, termination
of parental rights, child custody or visitation, child support, divorce,
annulment, legal separation or separate maintenance, probate or administration
of an estate, or other appropriate proceeding.
(2)  A respondent may not join a proceeding described in Subsection (1) with a
proceeding to adjudicate parentage brought under Title 78B, Chapter 14,
Uniform Interstate Family Support Act.
